Arkansas, session 2025, HB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-1202, concerning the definitions for
the laws on prohibited contracts by state agencies, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(5) "Promotional items" means one (1) or more items purchased by
a state agency with public funds to promote or advertise the agency,
including without limitation a:
*LGL120*
03-20-2025 15:43:04 LGL120

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 S3/20/25 HB1604
(A) Bumper sticker;
(B) Clothing item;
(C) Key chain;
(D) Mug;
(E) Pen; or
(F) Pin;
(6) "Public funds" means the same as defined in § 19-11-203;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 1, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-1-1204. Promotional items made in China prohibited.
A state agency shall not spend public funds to purchase promotional
items made in the People's Republic of China.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. The name of Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter
1, Subchapter 12 is changed from "Prohibited Contracts by State Agencies" to
"Prohibited Actions by State Agencies." The Arkansas Code Revision Commission
shall make all changes in the Arkansas Code necessary to implement this
section.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. Applicability.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply only to contracts executed on or
after the effective date of this act.

/s/McAlindon











03-20-2025 15:43:04 LGL120